Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-510
Disclosures of other digital assets of principal.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by the principal, or provided by a power of attorney, a custodian shall disclose to an agent with specific authority over digital assets or general authority to act on behalf of a principal a catalogue of electronic communications sent or received by the principal and digital assets, other than the content of electronic communications, of the principal if the agent gives the custodian:

(1) a written request for disclosure in physical or electronic form;

(2) an original or a copy of the power of attorney that gives the agent specific authority over digital assets or general authority to act on behalf of the principal;

(3) a certification by the agent, under penalty of perjury, that the power of attorney is in effect; and

(4) if requested by the custodian:

(A) a number, username, address, or other unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify the principal’s account; or

(B) evidence linking the account to the principal.

Laws 2016, LB829, § 10.